Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-520
Property; right-of-way; how procured.

Such sanitary district may acquire by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, real or personal property, right-of-way, and privilege, within or without its corporate limits, necessary for its corporate purposes.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 5, p. 290;

R.S.1913, § 1935;

C.S.1922, § 1876;

C.S.1929, § 31-614;

R.S.1943, § 31-520.